Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1227
Technically feasible, defined.

Technically feasible means that by virtue of engineering or spectrum usage, the proposed placement for a small wireless facility, or its design or site location, can be implemented without a reduction in the functionality of the small wireless facility.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 27.